Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.200

Legislative—Appropriations of money.

No money shall be appropriated except by ordinance and every such ordinance complete in the form in which it is finally passed shall remain on file with the city clerk for public inspection at least one week before final passage.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.200. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 16, part; RRS s 9105, part.]